Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 47 Commonsense Consumption Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 9, § 1, and Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 1, each enacted a chapter 46 in title 11. The chapter enacted by Laws 2005, ch. 91 has been redesignated as chapter 47 in title 11 at the direction of the legislative service office.

Laws 2005, ch 91, § 2, provides:

“This act applies to any action commenced on or after the effective date of this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

§ 11-47-101.
Short
title.

This chapter is known
and may be cited as the “Wyoming Commonsense Consumption Act”.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 1.

§ 11-47-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Livestock” means as defined in W.S. 11-39-101(a)(vi);

“Agricultural producer” means any producer of livestock, crops for food or fiber, dairy products and any other product for human consumption from an agricultural operation;

“Long term consumption” means the cumulative effect of the consumption of any qualified product and not the effect of a single instance of consumption;

“Qualified product” means any food or drink as defined in section 201(f) of the Federal Food Drug and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 321(f)), and specifically includes meat and meat products from livestock, food, fiber, dairy products and any other product for human consumption from an agricultural operation;

“Seller” means any person or entity lawfully engaged in the business of marketing, distributing, advertising or selling a qualified product;

“Trade association” means any association or business organization that is not operated for profit, if two (2) or more members are manufacturers, marketers, distributors, agricultural producers, advertisers or sellers of a qualified product;

“This act” means W.S.

11-47-101

through

11-47-103

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-47-103.
Limitation
on liability for long term consumption.

No manufacturer, seller, trade association, agricultural producer, wholesaler, broker or retailer of a qualified product is subject to civil liability for injury or death in any case in which liability is based on the individual’s weight gain, obesity or a health condition related to weight gain or obesity, and the weight gain, obesity or health condition results from the individual’s long term consumption of a qualified product.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not preclude civil liability if:

The claim of injury or death is based on a material violation of a composition, branding or labeling standard prescribed by state or federal law; and

The claimed injury or death was actually and proximately caused by that violation; and

The violation was committed with intent to deceive or injure consumers or with actual knowledge that the violation was injurious to consumers.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 91, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.